Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,143
Life insurance policy proceeds;
payment of interest; when.

(1) Any
insurance company authorized to do business in this state shall pay interest
on any proceeds due on a life insurance policy if:

(a) The insured was a resident
of this state on the date of death;

(b) The date of death was
on or after June 6, 1991;

(c) The beneficiary elects
in writing to receive the proceeds in a lump-sum payment; and

(d) The proceeds are not paid
to the beneficiary within thirty days of receipt of proof of death of the
insured by the insurance company.

(2) Interest
shall accrue from the date of receipt of proof of death to the date of payment
at the rate calculated pursuant to section 45-103 in effect on January 1 of
the calendar year in which occurs the date of receipt of proof of death. For
purposes of this section, date of payment shall include the date of the postmark
stamped on an envelope, properly addressed and postage prepaid, containing
the payment.

(3) If an
action is commenced to recover the proceeds, this section shall not require
the payment of interest for any period of time for which interest is awarded
pursuant to sections 45-103 to 45-103.04.

(4) A violation of this
section shall be an unfair claims settlement practice subject to the Unfair
Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act.

Laws 1991, LB 419, § 40;

Laws 2011, LB72, § 1.

Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act, see section 44-1536.